District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF TIIE DIS,TRICT OF COLUMBIA, tha.t this
21 act ma.y be cited as Ire '"Combined Reportimg Amendm.em: ht of 2026.,.
22 Sec. 2. Section 4 7-1001.04, Genera] definitions aft he District of Colum!biia Official
23 Code i:s amended as follow.s.:
24 (a) {7) .. Combined gmup"' is.· repealed and repllac-ed mr ead as fallows:
an
25 •••Combined gioup' :means the group of persam lmt must file a oombined 1etmn as
26 reqwred by § 47-1:80.5 .02a-1, Combined 1etum reqmred; joint md several liability ad § 47-
27 1:80.5 .02b~1 1.amition fi:om the Joya mefti.od of a:pportio.mnem: to the Finnigan method of
28 appomomnent. m.clumog a. group properly m.akmg a water'.s-edge electicm under § 47-1&10.07 A,
29 \Vatet1,s-edge e]ection; mitiia1icm.md withdrawal"
30 (jb) A new section (l.A) is a.dded as follows:
I

31 “‘Combined return’ means a tax return required to be filed for the combined group
32 containing information as provided in § 47-1805.02a-1, Combined return required; joint and
33 several liability or required by the Chief Financial Officer.”
34 (c) (10)(A) “Corporation” is amended by striking the phrase “would be subject to the
35 tax imposed by this chapter” and inserting the phrase “would be a ‘taxpayer.’”
36 (d) (28) “Internal Revenue Code of 1986” is amended by inserting the phrase “and
37 amendments thereto” after “October 22, 1986.”
38 (e) (49)(A) “Tax haven” is amended by inserting the phrase “, during the tax year in
39 question has no or nominal effective tax on the relevant income and any one or more of the
40 following:” after the phrase “means a jurisdiction that.”
41 (i) Paragraph (i) is amended by striking the phrase “For a particular tax year
42 in question has no, or nominal, effective tax on the relevant income and.”
43 (f) A new subsection (33A) is added as follows:
44 “‘Nexus’ means the physical, economic, electronic, or virtual presence or connection between a
45 taxpayer and the District of Columbia, whether the presence or connection is direct or indirect.”
46 (g) (55) “Unitary business” is repealed and replaced to read as follows:
47 “A group of two or more persons related by common ownership that are sufficiently
48 interdependent, integrated or interrelated through their activities so as to provide synergy and
49 mutual benefit and produce a significant sharing or exchange of value among them or a
50 significant flow of value between the separate parts. The term “unitary business” shall be
51 construed to the broadest extent permitted under the Constitution of the United States. A unitary
52 business includes that part of the business that meets the definition in this subsection (55) and is
53 conducted by a taxpayer through the taxpayer’s interest in a partnership, whether the interest in
2

54 that partnership is held directly or indirectly through a series of partnerships or other pass-
55 through entities.”
56 (h) (57) “Water’s-edge combined group” is amended by striking the statutory
57 reference “§ 47-1810.07” and inserting “§ 47-1810.07A, Water’s-edge election; initiation and
58 withdrawal” in its place.
59 Sec. 3. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
60 Sections 47-1805.02a, Combined reporting required, and 47-1810.06, Designation of
61 agent, are repealed. A new section 47-1805.02a-1, Combined return required; joint and several
62 liability of the District of Columbia Official Code is added to read as follows:
63 “(a) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2025, except as provided in § 47-
64 1810.07A, Water’s-edge election; initiation and withdrawal, all persons, wherever incorporated,
65 domiciled, organized, formed, or established, that are members of a unitary business shall file a
66 combined return as a combined group. That return must include the income and apportionment
67 factors, determined under § 47-1810.05A, Determination of the business income of the combined
68 group, and other information required by the Chief Financial Officer for all members of the
69 combined group wherever located or doing business. The combined return must be filed under
70 the name and federal employer identification number of the parent if the parent is a member of
71 the combined group. If there is no parent, or if the parent is not a group member, the members of
72 the combined group shall choose a member who the combined group reasonably expects will
73 have the largest amount of District taxable net income on a recurring basis to file the return. The
74 filing member must remain the same in subsequent years unless the filing member is no longer
75 the parent or is no longer a member of the combined group. The return must be signed by a
76 responsible officer of the filing member on behalf of the combined group members. Members of
3

77 the combined group are jointly and severally liable for the tax liability of the combined group
78 included in the combined return.
79 (b) The Chief Financial Officer may require that a combined return to include the income
80 and associated apportionment factors of persons that are not included pursuant to subsection (a)
81 of this section, but that are members of a unitary business, in order to reflect proper
82 apportionment of income of the entire unitary business. Authority to require combination under
83 this subsection (b) includes authority to require combination of the income and associated
84 apportionment factors of persons that are not subject to District tax or would not be subject to
85 District tax if doing business in the District.
86 (1) If the Chief Financial Officer determines that the reported income or loss
87 of a taxpayer engaged in a unitary business with a person not included pursuant to subsection (a)
88 of this section, or pursuant to an election under § 47-1810.07A, Water’s-edge election; initiation
89 and withdrawal, represents an avoidance or evasion of tax by such taxpayer, the Chief Financial
90 Officer may, on a case by case basis, require all or part of the income and associated
91 apportionment factors of such person be included in the taxpayer’s combined return.
92 (2) With respect to inclusion of associated apportionment factors pursuant to
93 this subsection (b), the Chief Financial Officer may require the exclusion of one or more of the
94 factors, the inclusion of one or more additional factors that will fairly represent the taxpayer’s
95 business activity in the District, or the employment of any other method to effectuate a proper
96 reflection of the total amount of income subject to apportionment and an equitable allocation and
97 apportionment of the taxpayer’s income.
98 (c) In the event of any inconsistency or conflict between any provision of Chapter 1 of
99 Title 9 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations and any provision of Chapter 18 of
4

100 Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code concerning combined reporting requirements,
101 the provisions of Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code shall govern
102 and control.
103 (d) The Chief Financial Officer shall adopt all regulations necessary to implement
104 combined reporting; to ensure that the tax liability and net income of any taxpayer, and of each
105 entity included in a combined report, are properly reported, determined, computed, assessed,
106 collected, and adjusted both during and after inclusion in the combined group; and to prescribe
107 the form, manner, timing, place, and allowable extensions for all required returns and reports.”
108 Sec. 4. Sections 47-1810.04, Determination of taxable income or loss using combined
109 report; components of income subject to tax in the District, application of tax credits and post-
110 apportionment deductions; determination of taxpayer's share of the business income of a
111 combine group apportionable to the District, and 47-1810.05, Determination of the business
112 income of the combined group. are repealed.
113 A new section 47-1810.05A, Determination of the business income of the combined
114 group, of the District of Columbia Official Code is added to read as follows:
115 “(A) The combined group calculates its District taxable net income as
116 provided in subsection A of this section.
117 (i) Determine the total combined group income or loss, before net operating loss
118 deduction, as follows:
119 (a) Each member of the combined group determines its separate
120 income or loss before net operating loss deduction, as follows:
121 (1) For a member incorporated in the United States or included in a
122 consolidated federal corporate income tax return, the member’s income or loss is the taxable
5

123 income for the member under the Internal Revenue Code, on a separate entity basis, after making
124 appropriate adjustments under District tax provisions.
125 (2) For any member not included in (A)(i)(a)(1) above:
126 (I) The member’s income or loss is determined from a profit
127 and loss statement prepared for that member on a separate entity basis in the currency in which
128 its books of account are regularly maintained, provided this profit and loss statement is subject to
129 an independent audit, adjusted to conform it to the accounting principles generally accepted in
130 the United States for the preparation of such statements and further modified to take into account
131 any book-tax adjustments necessary to reflect federal and District tax law. Income or loss so
132 computed includes all income wherever derived and is not limited to items of U.S. source
133 income or effectively connected income within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code. Items
134 of income, expense, gain or loss and related apportionment factors that are denominated in a
135 foreign currency must also be translated into U.S. dollars on a reasonable basis consistently
136 applied year-to-year and entity-by-entity. Unrealized foreign currency gains and losses are not
137 recognized. Income apportioned to the District is to be expressed in U.S. dollars.
138 (II) In lieu of the procedures set forth above in (A)(i)(a)(2)(I) or
139 in any case where it is necessary to fairly and consistently reflect the income or loss and
140 apportionment factors of foreign operations included in the unitary business, the Chief Financial
141 Officer may provide for other procedures to reasonably approximate the income or loss and
142 apportionment factors of members with foreign operations.
143 (b) Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, or by regulation,
144 income or loss of the members as determined under (A)(i)(a) of this section are combined,
145 eliminating items of income, expense, gain and loss from transactions between members of the
6

146 combined group, applying the consolidated filing rules under Internal Revenue Code and agency
147 regulations as if the combined group was a consolidated filing group.
148 (1) Dividends paid by one member of the combined group to
149 another member within the combined group are excluded from that member’s income to the
150 extent those dividends are paid out of the earnings and profits of the unitary business included in
151 the combined report in the current or an earlier year.
152 (2) A charitable expense incurred by a member of a combined
153 group, to the extent allowable as a deduction pursuant to section 170 of the Internal Revenue
154 Code of 1986, is subtracted first from the apportionable income of the combined group subject to
155 the income limitations of that section applied to the entire apportionable income of the group,
156 and any excess may be carried over as provided in section 170, subject to limitations in that
157 section.
158 (ii) Determine combined group ordinary apportionable
159 income or loss by eliminating from the amount determined in (A)(i) of this section:
160 (a) The amount of any net capital gain resulting
161 from application of Subchapter P of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, Treatment of capital
162 gains and losses; and
163 (b) Any other income or loss, or item of income,
164 expense, gain or loss, that is nonapportionable.
165 (iii) Determine the District’s share of combined group
166 ordinary apportionable income or loss by multiplying the amount determined under (A)(ii) of
167 this section by the combined group apportionment factor as determined under (B) of this section.
168 (iv) Determine the combined group District’s net capital
7

169 gain or loss from the application of Subchapter P of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
170 Treatment of capital gains and losses, and the amount of any District’s net capital loss carryover,
171 as follows:
172 (a) Each separate item of capital gain or loss for
173 the combined group is determined following Subchapter P of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
174 Treatment of capital gains and losses.
175 (b) Each separate item of apportionable capital
176 gain or loss is then apportioned using the combined group’s apportionment factor determined
177 under (B) of this section, and each separate item of nonapportionable capital gain or loss is
178 allocated under § 47-1810.02, Allocation and apportionment of District and non-District income.
179 (c) The capital gains or losses allocated or
180 apportioned to the District are then netted consistent with the provisions of Subchapter P of the
181 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, Treatment of capital gains and losses.
182 (d) If the amount determined in (A)(iv)(c) of
183 this section is a net capital gain, that gain is included in combined group taxable net income or
184 loss before net operating loss deduction as computed under (A)(vi) of this section.
185 (e) If the amount determined in (A)(iv)(c) of
186 this section is a net capital loss, that loss may not be deducted from other income but may be
187 carried over by the combined group and used to offset combined group capital gains, but only to
188 the extent that the amount or use of such capital loss carryover is not subject to limitations under
189 any provision of the Internal Revenue Code or applicable federal regulations, or would not be
190 subject to such limitations applied as if the combined group was the consolidated group.
191 (f) If the combined group capital loss carryover
8

192 must be attributed to particular members of the group for purposes of determining limitations
193 applicable to the amount or use of the capital loss under (A)(iv)(e) above, then this will be done
194 by multiplying the combined group net capital loss generated for any applicable year by a
195 fraction, the numerator of which is the separate entity net capital loss of the member for that
196 year, if any, and the denominator of which is the total separate entity net capital losses for all the
197 members of the combined group that had net capital losses for that year. A member’s separate
198 entity net capital loss carryover will be determined as follows:
199 (I) For each year in which the combined
200 group recognized a net capital loss, multiply the combined group net apportionable gains and
201 losses by the member’s separate entity apportionment factor determined under (B) of this
202 section, netting the resulting apportioned gains and losses as provided in (A)(iv) of this section;
203 then adding any nonapportionable gains and subtracting any losses allocated to the District that
204 were generated by that member.
205 (II) In no case may members of the
206 combined group be attributed total capital losses under (A)(iv)(f) of this section in excess of the
207 combined group net capital loss properly reported to the District in the tax year.
208 (III) In computing the net capital loss
209 carryover for the member of the combined group, the separate entity capital losses for all
210 members computed under (A)(iv)(f) of this section will be deemed to be used to offset combined
211 group capital gains in other years, as allowed under federal law, on a pro-rata basis, starting with
212 the earliest year.
213 (v) Determine the amount of any combined group
214 nonapportionable items of income, expense, gain or loss not allocated under (A)(iv)(b) of this
9

215 section that are allocable to the District under § 47-1810.02, Allocation and apportionment of
216 District and non-District income.
217 (vi) Determine the combined group District net income or loss
218 before net operating loss deduction by combining and netting the results from (A)(iii), (A)(iv)(d),
219 and (A)(v) of this section.
220 (vii) Determine the combined group District taxable net income
221 after any net operating loss deduction, by deducting from the amount of combined group District
222 net income computed under (A)(vi) of this section an allowable amount of the combined group’s
223 net operating loss carryover, determined under this paragraph (vii), as follows:
224 (a) The allowable amount of the combined group net
225 operating loss carryover in any tax year is:
226 (1) The total of the combined group
227 District losses determined under (A)(vi) of this section for prior years to the extent such losses
228 have not been used to offset the combined group’s District net income and to the extent those
229 losses are not otherwise limited by District law or (A)(vii) of this section; plus
230 (2) The net operating loss carryover of
231 any members of the group created before the member became a part of the group, but only to the
232 extent that the net operating loss carryover:
233 (I) represents net operating
234 losses that were properly attributed to the member under (A)(vii)(b) below if the member was
235 part of a separate District combined group when the losses were created;
236 (II) represents net operating
237 losses properly allocated or apportioned to the District in the year created;
10

238 (III) has not been used to offset
239 income of any taxpayer;
240 (IV) would not be subject to
241 limitations as to the amount or use applicable under any provision of the Internal Revenue Code
242 or federal regulations, or would not be subject to such limitations applied as if the combined
243 group was the consolidated group; and
244 (V) is not otherwise not limited by
245 District law; minus
246 (3) The net operating loss carryover of a
247 member of the combined group attributed to that member under (A)(vii)(b) below, that has not
248 been used to offset income and is not otherwise limited by District law as of the date that
249 member is no longer part of the combined group.
250 (b) If the combined group net operating
251 loss carryover must be attributed to particular members of the group for purposes of determining
252 limitations applicable to the amount or use of the net operating loss carryover under (A)(vii) of
253 this section, then this will be done by multiplying the combined group net loss generated for any
254 applicable year by a fraction, the numerator of which is the separate entity net loss of the
255 member for that year, if any, and the denominator of which is the total separate entity net losses
256 for all the members of the combined group that had net losses for that year. A member’s separate
257 entity net loss will be determined as follows:
258 (1) The amount of combined group ordinary
259 apportionable income determined under (A)(ii) of this section multiplied by the member’s
260 separate entity apportionment factor as determined under (B) of this section; plus
11

261 (2) The amount of any combined group net gain
262 determined under (A)(iv) of this section multiplied by the member’s separate entity
263 apportionment factor as determined under (B) of this section; plus or minus
264 (3) The amount of any nonapportionable items
265 of income, expense, gain or loss allocated to the District under (A)(v) of this section that were
266 generated by the member; plus or minus
267 (4) Any adjustments to properly reflect the
268 member’s separate entity loss.
269 (5) In no case shall members be attributed total
270 losses under (A)(vii)(b) of this section in excess of the combined group loss properly reported to
271 the District in the tax year.
272 (6) In computing the net operating loss
273 carryover for the member of the combined group, the separate entity net operating losses for all
274 members computed under (A)(iv)(f) of this section will be deemed to be used to offset combined
275 group net income in other years, as allowed under federal law, on a pro-rata basis, starting with
276 the earliest year.
277 (viii) Application of District tax credit. If the use of a tax credit
278 provided in any other section of this chapter is limited to District tax attributed to a member of a
279 combined group, then the tax that may be offset by the credit is calculated as follows:
280 (1) The amount of combined group ordinary
281 apportionable income determined under (A)(ii) of this section multiplied by the member’s
282 separate entity apportionment factor as determined under (B) of this section; plus
283 (2) The amount of any combined group net gain
12

284 determined under (A)(iv) of this section multiplied by the member’s separate entity
285 apportionment factor as determined under (B) of this section; plus or minus
286 (3) The amount of any nonapportionable items of
287 income, expense, gain or loss allocated to the District under (A)(v) of this section that were
288 generated by the member; plus or minus
289 (4) Any adjustments to properly reflect the member’s
290 separate entity loss; multiplied by
291 (5) The applicable tax rate.
292 (B) Allocation and apportionment. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, §
293 47–1810.02, Allocation and apportionment of District and non-District income, determines how
294 income or loss, or items making up income or loss, are allocated and apportioned to the District.
295 (i) Combined group apportionment factor. The combined group
296 apportionment factor is a percentage determined under § 47-1810.02, Allocation and
297 apportionment of District and non-District income, where the numerator of the factor(s)
298 include(s) amounts sourced to the District for the combined group’s unitary business, regardless
299 of the separate entity to which those factors may be attributed, and the denominator of the
300 factor(s) include(s) amounts associated with the combined group’s unitary business wherever
301 located.
302 (ii) Separate entity apportionment factor. The separate entity
303 apportionment factor for a member of the combined group is a percentage determined under §
304 47-1810.02, Allocation and apportionment of District and non-District income, where the
305 numerator of the factor(s) include(s) amounts sourced to the District for the member, and the
306 denominator of the factor(s) include(s) amounts associated with the combined group’s unitary
13

307 business wherever located.
308 (iii) If a member of the combined group holds a partnership interest,
309 that is not an unincorporated business under District law, from which it derives apportionable
310 income, the share of the partnership’s apportionment factor(s)s] to be included in the
311 apportionment factor(s) of the group is determined by multiplying the partnership’s factor(s) by a
312 ratio, the numerator of which is the amount of the partnership’s apportionable income properly
313 included in the member’s income, whether received directly or indirectly, and including any
314 guaranteed payments, and the denominator of which is the amount of the partnership’s total
315 apportionable income. If a member of the combined group directly or indirectly receives an
316 allocation of a partnership tax item, such as an item of loss or expense, so that it is not possible to
317 determine the member’s share of apportionable income, the Chief Financial Officer may provide
318 rules for inclusion of particular partnership factors, or portions of factors, in the combined
319 group’s factors.”
320 Sec 5. Section 47-1810.07, Water’s-edge reporting; initiation and withdrawal
321 election, is repealed.
322 A new section 47-1810.07A, Water’s-edge election; initiation and withdrawal, of the
323 District of Columbia Official Code is added to read as follows:
324 “(a) Water’s-edge election. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2025, members
325 of a unitary group that meet the requirements of subsection (b) of this section may elect to file as
326 a combined group pursuant to a water’s-edge election. Under such election, the combined group
327 takes into account all or a portion of the income and apportionment factors of only the following
328 members, otherwise included in the combined group pursuant to § 47-1805.02a-1, Combined
329 return required; joint and several liability, as described below:
14

330 (1) the entire income and apportionment factors of a member incorporated or
331 formed in the United States under the laws of any state, the District of Columbia, or any territory
332 or possession of the United States;
333 (2) the entire income and apportionment factors of a member, regardless of
334 the place incorporated or formed, if the average of its property, payroll, and receipts factors
335 within the United States is 20 percent or more;
336 (3) the entire income and apportionment factors of a member which is a
337 domestic international sales corporations, as described in sections 991 through 994 of the
338 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive; a foreign sales corporation, as described in sections
339 921 through 927 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive; or a member which is an
340 export trade corporation, as described in in sections 970 through 971 of the Internal Revenue
341 Code of 1986, inclusive;
342 (4) a member not described in subparagraphs (1), (2), or (3), inclusive, shall
343 include the portion of its income derived from or attributable to sources within the United States,
344 as determined under the provisions of Internal Revenue Code of 1986 without regard to federal
345 treaties, and its apportionment factors related thereto;
346 (5) for a member that is a “controlled foreign corporation,” as defined in
347 section 957 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, include income to the extent of the income of
348 that member that is defined in section 952 of Subpart F of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
349 (“Subpart F income”) not excluding lower-tier subsidiaries’ distributions of such income which
350 were previously taxed, determined without regard to federal treaties, and the apportionment
351 factors related to that income; any item of income received by a controlled foreign corporation is
352 excluded if such income was subject to an effective rate of income tax imposed by a foreign
15

353 country greater than 90 percent of the maximum rate of tax specified in section 11 of the Internal
354 Revenue Code of 1986;
355 (6) a member that earns more than 20 percent of its income, directly or
356 indirectly, from intangible property or service-related activities that are deductible against the
357 apportionable income of other members of the combined group, shall include the related income
358 and the apportionment factors; and
359 (7) the entire income and apportionment factors of a member that is doing
360 business in a tax haven, where “doing business in a tax haven” is defined as being engaged in
361 activity sufficient for that tax haven jurisdiction to impose a tax under United States
362 constitutional standards. If the member’s business activity within a tax haven is entirely outside
363 the scope of the laws, provisions and practices that cause the jurisdiction to meet the criteria
364 established in § 47-1801.04(49), (General definition of “tax haven”), the activity of the member
365 shall be treated as not having been conducted in a tax haven.
366 (b) Initiation and withdrawal of election.
367 (1) A water’s-edge election is effective only if made on a timely-filed,
368 original return for a tax year by the members of the unitary business. The Chief Financial Officer
369 shall develop rules and regulations governing the impact, if any, on the scope or application of a
370 water’s-edge election, including the procedures for election and termination or deemed election,
371 resulting from a change in the composition of the unitary group, the combined group, the
372 members, and any other similar change.
373 (2) Such election constitutes consent to the reasonable production of
374 documents and taking of depositions in accordance with District law.
375 (3) In the discretion of the Chief Financial Officer, a water’s-edge
376 election may be disregarded, in part or in whole, and the income and apportionment factors of
16

377 any member of the unitary group may be included in or excluded from the combined report
378 without regard to the provisions of this section, if any member of the unitary group fails to
379 comply with any provision of this chapter, or if a person otherwise not included in the water’s-
380 edge combined group was availed of with a substantial objective of avoiding District income tax.
381 (4) A water’s-edge election is binding for and applicable to the tax
382 year it is made and all tax years thereafter for a period of 10 years, subject to regulations adopted
383 by the Chief Financial Officer.
384 (c) Effect of water’s-edge election on excluded entities. The election under this chapter
385 has no effect on whether entities that are excluded from the water’s-edge combined group may
386 be separately liable for tax under District law. Entities subject to the District tax must separately
387 file and pay tax in the District.”
388 Sec. 6. Section 47-1803.03, Gross income — Deductions, of the District of Columbia
389 Official Code is amended as follows:
390 (a) (a)(16) “Subpart F income” is repealed.
391 (b) (a)(17) “Dividends from a wholly-owned subsidiary” is amended by striking
392 the “.” at the end of the sentence and inserting “subject to tax under Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the
393 District of Columbia Official Code.” in its place.
394 Sec. 7. Fiscal impact statement.
395 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement prepared by the Chief Financial Officer in
396 the committee report as the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General
397 Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official
398 Code § 1-301.47a).
399 Sec. 8. Applicability.
400 This act shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
17

401 Sec. 9. Effective Date.
402 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
403 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
404 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
405 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
406 Columbia Register.
18

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: June 24, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Combined Reporting Amendment Act of
2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on June 23,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027
through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The bill would codify
additional provisions that are needed to implement the Combined Reporting Amendment Act of
2024.1 The projected revenue from the bill has already been incorporated into the District’s revenue
estimates.
Background
The District requires combined reporting2 for taxpayers engaged in a “unitary businesses”3 with
activity inside and outside of the District of Columbia. Combined reporting requires various entities
1 Subtitle VII-A of the Fiscal Year 2025 Budget Support Act of 2024, Law 25-217, effective September 18,
2024.
2 D.C. Official Code § 47–1805.02a.
3 Per D.C. Official Code § 47-1801.04(55), “unitary business” means a single economic enterprise that is made
up either of separate parts of a single business entity or of a commonly controlled group of business entities
that are sufficiently interdependent, integrated, and interrelated through their activities so as to provide
synergy and mutual benefit that produces a sharing or exchange of value among them and a significant flow
of value to the separate parts.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Combined Reporting Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis
on June 23, 2026
in a “combined group”4 to report their combined income for tax purposes, along with allocation and
apportionment factors. Requirements for a combined group include that entities are engaged as a
unitary business. Apportionment factors, as set forth in law and regulations, provide how the
combined report allocates income derived from sources within and outside the District.
“Joyce” and “Finnigan” are two approaches to apportioning combined group income among
jurisdictions for tax purposes.5 The District adopted the “Joyce” method when it implemented
combined reporting. The “Joyce” method requires the District to establish taxing jurisdiction
separately over every member of a corporate group selling in the District. The “Finnigan” method of
combined reporting treats the entire unitary business as a single taxpayer. The Combined Reporting
Amendment Act of 2024 required6 combined filers to switch to using the “Finnigan” method starting
in tax year 20267. A unitary business will be treated as one taxpayer for purposes of sourcing unitary
receipts, and the apportionment factor attributes in the numerator will be derived from all the
members of the combined group, regardless of whether a member has nexus8 with the District of
Columbia. The bill provides the amendments to, and repeals of, provisions of law necessary to
implement the Finnigan method of apportionment as follows:
The bill updates the definition of a “combined group” and adds a definition for a “combined return.”
The bill updates the definition of “unitary business” to allow for a group of two or more persons
related by common ownership to be a unitary business, removing a current law reference to a
requirement to be “a single economic enterprise that is made up either of separate parts of a single
business entity or of a commonly controlled group of business entities.” The bill makes other
conforming amendments to definitions.
The bill repeals the current combined reporting requirements and determination of business income
of a combined group and creates new ones to begin in tax year 2026.9 Under the bill, the combined
group calculates its District net taxable income by determining the separate income or loss before
net operating loss deduction of each member of the group and then by combining members’ income
or loss while eliminating items of income, expense, and gain and loss from transactions between
members of the combined group.10 The bill then outlines what the combined group shall eliminate
from its District net taxable income to calculate the combined group ordinary apportionable net
income or loss. The combined group must apply an apportionment factor to its apportionable net
income or loss as outlined in the bill, including the application of the apportionment factors in D.C.
4 Per D.C. Official Code § 47-1801.04(7), “combined group” means the group of all persons whose income and
apportionment factors are required to be taken into account pursuant to § 47-1805.02a(a) and (b) and the
pertinent regulations in determining the taxpayer’s share of the net business income or loss apportionable to
the District.
5 “Joyce” and “Finnigan” refer to two court cases in California that ruled on apportionment methods for
combined reporting.
6 D.C. Official Code § 47–1805.02b.
7 Specifically, for tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.
8 The bill defines “nexus” to mean “the physical, economic, electronic, or virtual presence or connection
between a taxpayer and the District of Columbia, whether the presence or connection is direct or indirect.”
9 Specifically, tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.
10 Including applying the consolidated filing rules under Internal Revenue Code and IRS regulations as if the
combined group was a consolidated filing group.
Page 2 of 3

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Combined Reporting Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis
on June 23, 2026
Official Code § 47–1810.0211 and allocation of nonapportionable income. The bill outlines how the
combined group’s net capital gain or loss is determined and lays out allowable amounts of net
operating losses that may be carried over by the combined group.
The bill makes conforming edits to the requirements for a “water’s edge” election12. Previously a
taxpayer had to make an election to file under the worldwide reporting category. Under the bill, the
default reporting position is worldwide, but taxpayers may elect to file “water’s edge” reporting.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027
through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The bill would codify
additional provisions that are needed to implement the Combined Reporting Amendment Act of
2024.13 The projected revenue from the bill has already been incorporated into the District’s revenue
estimates as follows:
Combined Reporting Amendment Act of 2026
Revenue Included in the District’s Revenue Estimates
($ thousands)
FY 2026 FY 2027 FY 2028 FY 2029 FY 2030 Total
Increase in
corporate tax $0 $0 $23,100 $15,800 $15,800 $54,700
collections
11 Beginning with tax year 2015, all business income is apportioned by the sales factor. The sales factor is a
fraction, the numerator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer in the District during the tax period, and the
denominator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer everywhere during the tax period.
12 By repealing D.C. Official Code § 47-1810.07 and creating a new section, D.C. Official Code § 47-1810.07A
(Water’s-edge election; initiation and withdrawal).
13 Subtitle VII-A of the Fiscal Year 2025 Budget Support Act of 2024, Law 25-217, effective September 18,
2024.
Page 3 of 3